California statutes. Labor Code
If the department reports to the Governor that a condition of extraordinary unemployment caused by industrial depression does exist within this state, the Department of Finance may apportion the available Emergency Fund among the several state agencies for the extension of the public works of the state under the charge or direction thereof, in the manner which the Department of Finance believes to be best adapted to advance the public interest by providing the maximum of public employment consistent with the most useful, permanent, and economic extension of public works.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 46, Sec. 98.   (SB 1038)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2014.

The Department of Employment Development immediately upon the publication of a finding under this chapter that a period of extraordinary unemployment due to industrial depression exists throughout this state shall prepare approved lists of applicants for public employment, secure full information as to their industrial qualifications, and shall submit the same to the Department of Finance for transmission to the state agencies which avail themselves of the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1207.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 8.5. CAR WASHES [2050. - 2068.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [2050. - 2053.]

2050.

The enactment of this part is an exercise of the police power of the State of California for the protection for the public welfare, prosperity, health, safety, and peace of its people. The civil penalties provided by this chapter are in addition to any other penalty provided by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 825, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2051.

As used in this part:

(a) “Car washing and polishing” means washing, cleaning, drying, polishing, detailing, servicing, or otherwise providing cosmetic care to vehicles. “Car washing and polishing” does not include motor vehicle repair, as defined in Section 9880.1 of the Business and Professions Code.

(b) (1) “Employer” means any individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, joint venture, or association engaged in the business of car washing and polishing that engages any other individual in providing those services.

(2) “Employer” does not
 include any charitable, youth, service, veteran, or sports group, club, or association that conducts car washing and polishing on an intermittent basis to raise funds for charitable, education, or religious purposes. “Employer” does not include any licensed vehicle dealer or car rental agency that conducts car washing and polishing ancillary to its primary business of selling, leasing, or servicing vehicles. “Employer” does not include either a new motor vehicle dealer, as defined in Section 426 of the Vehicle Code, that is primarily engaged in the business of selling, leasing, renting, or servicing vehicles or an automotive repair dealer, as defined by subdivision (a) of Section 9880.1 of the Business and Professions Code, who is primarily engaged in the business of repairing and diagnosing malfunctions of motor vehicles. “Employer” does not include any self-service car wash or automated car wash
 that has employees for cashiering or maintenance purposes only.

(c) “Employee” means any person, including a minor or a person who is not a citizen or national of the United States, who renders actual car washing and polishing services in any business for an employer, whether for tips or for wages, and whether wages are calculated by time, piece, task, commission, or other method of calculation, and whether the services are rendered on a commission, concessionaire, or other basis.

(d) “Commissioner” means the Labor Commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 39.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2052.

Every employer shall keep accurate records for three years, showing all of the following:

(a) The names and addresses of all employees engaged in rendering actual services for any business of the employer.

(b) The hours worked daily by each employee, including the times the employee begins and ends each work period.

(c) All gratuities received daily by the employer, whether received directly from the employee or indirectly by deduction from the wages of the employee or otherwise.

(d) The wage and wage rate paid each payroll period.

(e) The age of all minor employees.

(f) Any other conditions of employment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 825, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2053.

The Division of Labor Standards and Enforcement shall enforce this chapter. The commissioner may adopt any regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 825, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Registration [2054. - 2065.]

2054.

Every employer shall register with the commissioner annually.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 825, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2055.

The commissioner shall not permit any employer to register, or to renew registration, until all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) The employer has applied for registration to the commissioner by presenting proof of compliance with the local government’s business licensing or regional regulatory requirements.

(b) The employer has obtained a surety bond issued by a surety company admitted to do business in this state. The principal sum of the bond shall not be less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000). The employer shall file a copy of the bond with the commissioner.

(1) The bond required by
 this section shall be in favor of, and payable to, the people of the State of California, and shall be for the benefit of any employee damaged by his or her employer’s failure to pay wages, interest on wages, or fringe benefits, or damaged by violation of Section 351 or 353.

(2) Thirty days prior to the cancellation or termination of any surety bond required by this section, the surety shall send written notice to both the employer and the commissioner, identifying the bond and the date of the cancellation or termination.

(3) An employer shall not conduct any business until the employer obtains a new surety bond and files a copy of it with the commissioner.

(4) This subdivision shall not apply to an employer covered by a valid collective bargaining agreement, if the agreement expressly provides for all of the
 following:

(A) Wages.

(B) Hours of work.

(C) Working conditions.

(D) An expeditious process to resolve disputes concerning nonpayment of wages.

(c) The employer has documented that a current workers’ compensation insurance policy is in effect for the employees.

(d) The employer has paid the fees established pursuant to Section 2059.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 110.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2056.

When a certificate of registration is originally issued or renewed under this chapter, the commissioner shall provide related and supplemental information to the registrant regarding business administration and applicable labor laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 825, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2057.

Proof of registration shall be by an official Division of Labor Standards Enforcement registration form. Each employer shall post the registration form where it may be read by the employees during the workday.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 825, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2058.

At least 30 days prior to the expiration of each registrant’s registration, the commissioner shall mail a renewal notice to the last known address of the registrant. However, omission of the commissioner to provide the renewal notice in accordance with this subdivision may not excuse a registrant from making timely application for renewal of registration, may not be a defense in any action or proceeding involving failure to renew registration, and may not subject the commissioner to any legal liability.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 825, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2059.

(a) (1) The commissioner shall collect from employers a registration fee for each branch location, and, except as provided in paragraph (2), may periodically adjust the registration fee, in an amount sufficient to fund all direct and indirect costs to administer and enforce this part.

(2) The fee established pursuant to paragraph (1) shall not be increased unless the published fund balance is projected to fall below 25 percent of annual expenditures.

(b) In addition to the fee in subdivision (a), each employer shall be assessed an annual fee in an amount equivalent to 20 percent of the registration
 fee collected pursuant to subdivision (a) for each branch location that shall be deposited in the Car Wash Worker Restitution Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 185.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2060.

No employer may conduct any business without complying with the registration and bond requirements of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 825, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2061.

The commissioner may not approve the registration of any employer until all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) The employer has executed a written application, in a form prescribed by the commissioner, subscribed, and sworn by the employer containing the following:

(1) The name of the business entity and, if applicable, its fictitious or “doing business as” name.

(2) The form of the business entity and, if a corporation, all of the following:

(A) The date of incorporation.

(B) The state in which incorporated.

(C) If a foreign corporation, the date the articles of incorporation were filed with the California Secretary of State.

(D) Whether the corporation is in good standing with the Secretary of State.

(3) The federal employer identification number (FEIN) and the state employer identification number (SEIN) of the business.

(4) The business’ address and telephone number and, if applicable, the addresses and telephone numbers of any branch locations.

(5) Whether the application is for a new or renewal registration and, if the application is for a renewal, the prior registration number.

(6) The names, residential addresses, telephone numbers, and Social Security numbers of the following persons:

(A) All corporate officers, if the business entity is a corporation.

(B) All persons exercising management responsibility in the applicant’s office, regardless of form of business entity.

(C) All persons, except bona fide employees on regular salaries, who have a financial interest of 10 percent or more in the business, regardless of the form of business entity, and the actual percent owned by each of those persons.

(7) The policy number, effective date, expiration date, and name and address of the carrier of the applicant business’ current workers’ compensation coverage.

(8) Whether any persons named in response to subparagraphs (A), (B), or (C) of subparagraph (6) of this section presently:

(A) Owe any unpaid wages.

(B) Have unpaid judgments outstanding.

(C) Have any liens or suits pending in court against himself or herself.

(D) Owe payroll taxes, or personal, partnership, or corporate income taxes, Social Security taxes, or disability insurance.

An applicant who answers affirmatively to any item described in paragraph (8) shall provide, as part of the application, additional information on the unpaid amounts, including the name and address of the party owed, the amount owed, and any existing payment arrangements.

(9) Whether any persons named in response to subparagraphs (A), (B), or (C) of paragraph (6) of this section have ever been cited or assessed any penalty for violating any provision of the Labor Code.

An applicant who answers affirmatively to any item described in paragraph (9) shall provide additional information, as part of the application, on the date, nature of citation, amount of penalties assessed for each citation, and the disposition of the citation, if any. The application shall describe any appeal filed. If the citation was not appealed, or if it was upheld on appeal, the applicant shall state whether the penalty assessment was paid.

(b) The employer has paid a registration fee to the commissioner pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 2055.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 825, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2062.

The commissioner may not register or renew the registration of an employer in any of the following circumstances:

(a) The employer has not fully satisfied any final judgment for unpaid wages due to an employee or former employee of a business for which the employer is required to register under this chapter.

(b) The employer has failed to remit the proper amount of contributions required by the Unemployment Insurance Code or the Employment Development Department had made an assessment for those unpaid contributions against the employer that has become final and the employer has not fully paid the amount of delinquency for those unpaid contributions.

(c) The employer has failed to remit the amount of Social Security and Medicare tax contributions required by the Federal Insurance Contributions Act (FICA) to the Internal Revenue Service and the employer has not fully paid the amount or delinquency for those unpaid contributions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 825, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2063.

On the Web site of the Department of Industrial Relations the Labor Commissioner shall post a list of registered car washing and polishing businesses, including the name, address, registration number, and effective dates of registration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 825, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2064.

An employer who fails to register pursuant to Section 2054 is subject to a civil fine of one hundred dollars ($100) for each calendar day, not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), the employer conducts car washing and polishing while unregistered.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 825, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2065.

(a) The Car Wash Worker Restitution Fund is established in the State Treasury.

(1) The following moneys shall be deposited into this fund:

(A) The annual fee required pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2059.

(B) Fifty percent of the fines collected pursuant to Section 2064.

(C) Pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2059, an amount equal to 20 percent of the initial registration fee required pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2059.

(2) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the moneys in the fund shall
 be disbursed by the commissioner only to persons determined by the commissioner to have been damaged by the failure to pay wages and penalties and other damages by any employer.

(A) In making this determination, the Labor Commissioner shall disburse amounts from the fund to ensure the payment of wages, interest, and any damages or other monetary relief arising from the violation of orders of the Industrial Welfare Commission or from a violation of this code, including statutory penalties recoverable by an employee, determined to be due to a car wash worker as a result of a violation of this code by a registered or unregistered car wash business.

(B) Any disbursement shall be made pursuant to a claim for recovery from the fund in accordance with procedures prescribed by the Labor Commissioner.

(C) Any disbursed funds
 subsequently recovered by the Labor Commissioner from a liable party pursuant to an assignment of the claim to the commissioner for recovery of due amounts, including recovery from a surety under a bond pursuant to Section 2055, or which are otherwise recovered by the Labor Commissioner from a liable party, shall be returned to the fund.

(b) The Car Wash Worker Fund is established in the State Treasury.

(1) The following moneys shall be deposited into this fund:

(A) Fifty percent of the fines collected pursuant to Section 2064.

(B) The initial registration fee required pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2059, less the amount specified in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(2) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the moneys in this fund shall be applied to all direct and indirect costs incurred by the commissioner in administering this part and all direct and indirect costs of enforcement and investigation of the car washing and polishing industry.

(c) The Department of Industrial Relations may establish by regulation those procedures necessary to carry out this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 28, Sec. 27.   (SB 96)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Successorship [2066. - 2066.]

2066.

A successor to any employer that is engaged in car washing and polishing that owed wages and penalties to the predecessor’s former employee or employees is liable for those wages and penalties if the successor meets any of the following criteria:

(a) Uses substantially the same facilities or workforce to offer substantially the same services as the predecessor employer.

(b) Shares in the ownership, management, control of the labor relations, or interrelations of business operations with the predecessor employer.

(c) Employs in a managerial capacity any person who directly or indirectly controlled the wages, hours, or working conditions of the affected employees of the predecessor employer.

(d) Is an immediate family member of any owner, partner, officer, or director of the predecessor employer of any person who had a financial interest in the predecessor employer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 825, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Reporting [2068. - 2068.]

2068.

The commissioner shall study and report to the Legislature, not later than December 31, 2008, on the status of labor law violations and enforcement in the car washing and polishing industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 656, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 8.6. Warehouse Distribution Centers [2100. - 2112.]

2100.

As used in this part:

(a) “Commissioner” means the Labor Commissioner.

(b) “Defined time period” means any unit of time measurement equal to or less than the duration of an employee’s shift, and includes hours, minutes, and seconds and any fraction thereof.

(c) “Division” means the Division of Occupational Safety and Health.

(d) “Employee” means a nonexempt employee who works at a warehouse distribution center.

(e) (1) “Employee work speed data” means information an employer collects, stores, analyzes, or interprets relating to an individual employee’s performance of a quota, including, but not limited to, quantities of tasks performed, quantities of items or materials handled or produced, rates or speeds of tasks performed, measurements or metrics of employee performance in relation to a quota, and time categorized as performing tasks or not performing tasks.

(2) “Employee work speed data” does not include qualitative performance assessments, personnel records, or itemized wage statements pursuant to Section 226, except for any content of those records that includes employee work speed data as defined in this part.

(f) “Employer” means a person who directly or indirectly, or through
 an agent or any other person, including through the services of a third-party employer, temporary service, or staffing agency or similar entity, employs or exercises control over the wages, hours, or working conditions of 100 or more employees at a single warehouse distribution center or 1,000 or more employees at one or more warehouse distribution centers in the state. For purposes of this definition, all employees of an employer’s commonly controlled group, as that term is defined in Section 25105 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, shall be counted in determining the number of employees employed at a single warehouse distribution center or at one or more warehouse distribution centers in the state.

(g) “Person” means an individual, corporation, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, limited liability company,
 business trust, estate, trust, association, joint venture, agency, instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity, whether domestic or foreign.

(h) “Quota” means a work standard under which an employee
 is assigned or required to perform at a specified productivity speed, or perform a quantified number of tasks, or to handle or produce a quantified amount of material, within a defined time period and under which the employee may suffer an adverse employment action if they fail to complete the performance standard.

(i) (1) “Warehouse distribution center” means an establishment as defined by any of the following North American Industry Classification System (NAICS) Codes, however that establishment is denominated:

(A) 493110 for General Warehousing and Storage.

(B) 423 for Merchant Wholesalers, Durable Goods.

(C) 424 for
 Merchant Wholesalers, Nondurable Goods.

(D) 454110 for Electronic Shopping and Mail-Order Houses.

(2) The term “warehouse distribution center” does not include NAICS Code 493130, Farm Product Warehousing and Storage.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 197, Sec. 3.   (AB 701)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2101.

Each employer shall provide to each employee, upon hire, or within 30 days of the effective date of this part, a written description of each quota to which the employee is subject, including the quantified number of tasks to be performed or materials to be produced or handled, within the defined time period, and any potential adverse employment action that could result from failure to meet the quota.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 197, Sec. 3.   (AB 701)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2102.

An employee shall not be required to meet a quota that prevents compliance with meal or rest periods, use of bathroom facilities, including reasonable travel time to and from bathroom facilities, or occupational health and safety laws in the Labor Code or division standards. An employer shall not take adverse employment action against an employee for failure to meet a quota that does not allow a worker to comply with meal and rest periods, or occupational health and safety laws in the Labor Code or division standards, or for failure to meet a quota that has not been disclosed to the employee pursuant to Section 2101.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 197, Sec. 3.   (AB 701)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2103.

(a) Any actions taken by an employee to comply with occupational health and safety laws in the Labor Code or division standards shall be considered time on task and productive time for purposes of any quota or monitoring system.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), consistent with existing law, meal and rest breaks are not considered productive time unless the employee is required to remain on call.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 197, Sec. 3.   (AB 701)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2104.

(a) (1) If a current or former employee believes that meeting a quota caused a violation of their right to a meal or rest period or required them to violate any occupational health and safety laws in the Labor Code or division standards, they have the right to request, and the employer shall provide, a written description of each quota to which the employee is subject and a copy of the most recent 90 days of the employee’s own personal work speed data.

(2) If a former employee requests a written description of the quotas to which they were subject and a copy of their own personal work speed data pursuant to paragraph (1), the employer shall provide
 90 days of the former employee’s quotas and personal work speed data for the 90 days prior to the date of the employee’s separation from the employer.

(3) A former employee is limited to one request pursuant to this subdivision.

(b) An employer that receives a written or oral request for information pursuant to subdivision (a) shall comply with the request as soon as practicable, but no later than 21 calendar days from the date of the request.

(c) Nothing in this section requires an employer to use quotas or monitor work speed data. An employer that does not monitor this data has no obligation to provide it.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 197, Sec. 3.   (AB 701)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2105.

For purposes of this part, there shall be a rebuttable presumption of unlawful retaliation if an employer in any manner discriminates, retaliates, or takes any adverse action against any employee within 90 days of the employee doing either of the following:

(a) Initiating the employee’s first request in a calendar year for information about a quota or personal work speed data pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2104.

(b) Making a complaint related to a quota alleging any violation of Sections 2101 to 2104, inclusive, to the commissioner, the division, other local or state governmental agency, or the
 employer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 197, Sec. 3.   (AB 701)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2106.

Upon receiving a complaint regarding a violation of this part, a state or local enforcement entity may request or subpoena the records of warehouse distribution center quotas and employee work speed data.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 197, Sec. 3.   (AB 701)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2107.

(a) The commissioner shall do all of the following:

(1) The commissioner shall enforce this part by engaging in coordinated and strategic enforcement efforts with the divisions within the Department of Industrial Relations, including the Division of Occupational Safety and Health and the Division of Workers’ Compensation. The commissioner shall have access to data from the department including employer-reported injury data and enforcement actions in warehouses, and the identity of uninsured employers, and employers who are committing workers’ compensation fraud, wage theft, or other information relevant to the commissioner’s authority.

(2) The commissioner shall strategically collaborate with stakeholders to educate workers and employers about their rights and obligations under this part, respectively, in order to increase compliance.

(3) (A) The commissioner shall report to the Legislature by January 1, 2023, the number of claims filed with the commissioner under this part, data on warehouse production quotas in warehouses in which the Division of Workers’ Compensation has indicated that annual employee injury rates are above the
 industry average, and the number of investigations undertaken and enforcement actions initiated, per employer.

(B) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under subparagraph (A) is inoperative on January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(C) A report to be submitted pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(b) If a particular worksite or employer is found to have an annual employee injury rate of at least 1.5 times higher than the warehousing industry’s average annual injury rate, the Division of Occupational Safety and Health or the Division of Workers’ Compensation shall notify the commissioner, and the commissioner shall determine whether an investigation of violations pursuant to this part, if relevant to the commissioner’s authority, is appropriate. The commissioner may coordinate enforcement with other divisions within the Department of Industrial Relations, as needed.

(c) The commissioner shall have the authority to adopt regulations relating to the procedures for an employee to make a complaint alleging a violation of this part.

(d) The commissioner shall enforce this part using the procedures set forth in Sections 98, 98.3, 98.7, 98.74, and 1197.1.

(e) In any successful action brought by the commissioner to enforce this part, the court may grant injunctive relief in order to obtain compliance with the part, and shall award costs and reasonable attorney’s fee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 197, Sec. 3.   (AB 701)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2108.

A current or former employee may bring an action for injunctive relief to obtain compliance with Sections 2101 to 2104, inclusive, and may, upon prevailing in the action, recover costs and reasonable attorney’s fees in that action. In any action involving a quota that prevented the compliance with regulations promulgated by the Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board, the injunctive relief shall be limited to suspension of the quota and any adverse action that resulted from its enforcement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 197, Sec. 3.   (AB 701)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2109.

In any action by a current or former employee that could be brought pursuant to the Labor Code Private Attorneys General Act of 2004 (Part 13 (commencing with Section 2698)) for violations of this part, the employer shall have the right to cure alleged violations as set forth in Section 2699.3. If, in that action, a violation of any occupational health and safety laws in the Labor Code or division standards contained in or interpreting Division 5 (commencing with Section 6300) is alleged, the current or former employee shall comply with the applicable procedural requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 2699.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 197, Sec. 3.   (AB 701)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2110.

This part does not limit the authority of the Attorney General, a district attorney, or a city attorney, either upon their own complaint or the complaint of any person acting for themselves or the general public, to prosecute actions, either civil or criminal, for violations of this part, or to enforce the provisions thereof independently and without specific direction of the commissioner or the division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 197, Sec. 3.   (AB 701)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2111.

This part does not preempt any city, county, or city and county ordinance that provides equal or greater protection to employees who are covered by this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 197, Sec. 3.   (AB 701)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2112.

The provisions of this part are severable. If any provision of this part or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 197, Sec. 3.   (AB 701)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 9. HEALTH [2260. - 2441.]



  CHAPTER 1. Sanitary Conditions [2260. - 2441.]



  ARTICLE 1. Sanitary Standards [2260. - 2260.]

2260.

All employers shall comply with standards relating to sanitary facilities adopted by the Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 140) of Division 1.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 486, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Foundries and Metal Shops [2330. - 2331.]

2330.

The owner or manager of every foundry or metal shop engaged in the casting, fabricating, or working over in any manner of any metal or compound, where one or more persons are employed, shall maintain for the use of the employees wash bowls, sinks or other appliances and a water closet connected with running water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1171.)
-------------------------------------------

2331.

The owner or manager of every foundry or metal shop engaged in the casting, fabricating, or working over in any manner of any metal or compound, where one or more persons are employed, shall comply with standards relating to mechanical ventilation systems adopted by the Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 140) of Division 1.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 486, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Factories and Business Establishments [2350. - 2355.]

2350.

Every factory, workshop, mercantile or other establishment in which one or more persons are employed, shall be kept clean and free from the effluvia arising from any drain or other nuisance, and shall be provided, within reasonable access, with a sufficient number of toilet facilities for the use of the employees. When there are five or more employees who are not all of the same gender, a sufficient number of separate toilet facilities shall be provided for the use of each sex, which shall be plainly so designated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 91, Sec. 107.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

2351.

Every factory or workshop in which one or more persons are employed shall be so ventilated while work is carried on that the air will not become injurious to the health of the employees, and shall also be so ventilated as to render harmless, as far as practicable, all injurious gases, vapors, dust, or other impurities generated in the course of the manufacturing process or handicraft carried on therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 800.)
-------------------------------------------

2352.

No place which the Labor Commissioner condemns as unhealthy and unsuitable, shall be used as a place of employment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1943, Ch. 486.)
-------------------------------------------

2353.

In any factory, workshop, or other establishment where dust, filaments, or injurious gases are produced or generated, which may be inhaled by employees, the person, under whose authority the work is carried on, shall cause to be provided and used, exhaust fans or blowers with pipes and hoods extending therefrom to each machine, contrivance or apparatus by which dust, filaments or injurious gases are produced or generated. The fans and blowers, and the pipes and hoods, shall be properly fitted and adjusted, and of power and dimensions sufficient to prevent the dust, filaments, or injurious gases from escaping into the atmosphere of any room where employees are at work.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

2354.

Any person violating this article is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than six hundred dollars ($600), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than 30 days nor more than 90 days, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 216.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

2355.

The Labor Commissioner shall enforce this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. General Health Provisions [2440. - 2441.]

2440.

All employers shall comply with standards relating to the ready availability of medical services and first aid adopted by the Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board, pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 140) of Division 1.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 486, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

2441.

(a) Every employer of labor in this state shall, without making a charge therefor, provide fresh and pure drinking water to his or her employees during working hours. Access to the drinking water shall be permitted at reasonable and convenient times and places. Any violation of this section is punishable for each offense by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50), nor more than two hundred dollars ($200), or by imprisonment for not more than 30 days, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(b) The State Department of Health Services and all health officers of counties, cities, and health districts shall enforce the provisions of this section pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 118390 of the Health and Safety Code. The enforcement shall not be construed to abridge or limit in any manner the jurisdiction of the Division of Industrial Safety of the Department of Industrial Relations pursuant to Division 5 (commencing with Section 6300).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 380.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 9.5. Grocery Workers [2500. - 2522.]

2500.

(a) Supermarkets and other grocery retailers are the primary points of distribution for food and other daily necessities for the residents of California and are therefore essential to the vitality of every California community.

(b) The state has a compelling interest in ensuring the welfare of the residents of its communities through the maintenance of health and safety standards in grocery establishments.

(c) Experienced grocery retail workers with knowledge of proper sanitation procedures, health regulations and laws, and an experience-based understanding of the clientele and communities in which the retailer is located are essential in furthering this interest and the state’s
 investments in health and safety.

(d) A transitional retention period for grocery retail workers upon change of ownership, control, or operation of grocery stores ensures stability throughout the state for these vital workers, which, in turn, results in preservation of health and safety standards.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 212, Sec. 1.   (AB 359)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2502.

For purposes of this part, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Change in control” means any sale, purchase, assignment, acquisition, transfer, contribution, or other disposition of all or substantially all of the assets, cash on hand, or a controlling interest, including by consolidation, merger, or reorganization, of or by the incumbent grocery employer or any person who controls the incumbent grocery employer or any grocery establishment under the operation or control of either the incumbent grocery employer or any person who controls the incumbent grocery employer. 

(b) “Eligible grocery worker” means any individual whose primary place of employment is at the grocery establishment subject to a change in control,